Maine, session 132, LD1578.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §332, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 343, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Subsequent review following approval. When the commissioner has approved an
application filed unconditionally or subject to conditions pursuant to section 335,
subsection 8, the commissioner may conduct a subsequent review to ensure compliance
with any terms or conditions of approval within 3 years after the approved activity is
undertaken. The 3-year time limitation does not apply to a subsequent review to ensure
that the requirement set forth in section 335, subsection 1, paragraph G continues to be met
or to ensure the maintenance of health services after a circumstance described under section
331, subsection 1 has occurred or a change not described under section 331, subsection 1
that constitutes a significant disruption to or removal of a health service has occurred, as
determined by the commissioner. In any subsequent review, the commissioner may hold a
public hearing and may consider any material or significant changes in factors or
circumstances relied upon by the commissioner in approving the application and significant
and relevant information that either is new or was withheld by the applicant at the time of
the process under section 335. If, upon review, the commissioner determines that any terms
or conditions of the approval have not been met, the commissioner may take enforcement
action consistent with subsection 3 and other applicable provisions of this Act.